Utah statutes.
78A-2-222.   Disqualification for interest or relation to parties.

(1)  Except by consent of all parties, a justice, judge, or justice court judge may not sit or act in any action or proceeding:

(a)  to which he is a party, or in which he is interested;

(b)  when he is related to either party by consanguinity or affinity within the third degree, computed according to the rules of the common law; or

(c)  when he has been attorney or counsel for either party in the action or proceeding.

(2)  The provisions of this section  do not apply to the arrangement of the calendar or the regulation of the order of business, nor to the power of transferring the action or proceeding to some other court.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

